Wisconsin, session 2025, AB257.
do enact as follows:AB257,11Section 1. 29.193 (1m) (a) 2. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,4,6229.193 (1m) (a) 2. (intro.) Has a permanent substantial loss of function in one 3or both arms or one or both hands and fails to meet the minimum standards of any 4one of the following standard tests, administered under the direction of a licensed 5physician, a licensed physician assistant, a licensed chiropractor, or a certified 6licensed advanced practice registered nurse prescriber:AB257,27Section 2. 29.193 (2) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,5,4829.193 (2) (b) 2. An applicant shall submit an application on a form prepared 9and furnished by the department, which shall include a written statement or report 1prepared and signed by a licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, a 2licensed chiropractor, a licensed podiatrist, or a certified licensed advanced practice 3registered nurse prescriber prepared no more than 6 months preceding the 4application and verifying that the applicant is physically disabled.AB257,35Section 3. 29.193 (2) (c) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,5,17629.193 (2) (c) 3. The department may issue a Class B permit to an applicant 7who is ineligible for a permit under subd. 1., 2. or 2m. or who is denied a permit 8under subd. 1., 2. or 2m. if, upon review and after considering the physical condition 9of the applicant and the recommendation of a licensed physician, a licensed 10physician assistant, a licensed chiropractor, a licensed podiatrist, or a certified 11licensed advanced practice registered nurse prescriber selected by the applicant 12from a list of licensed physicians, licensed physician assistants, licensed 13chiropractors, licensed podiatrists, and certified licensed advanced practice nurse 14prescribers registered nurses compiled by the department, the department finds 15that issuance of a permit complies with the intent of this subsection. The use of this 16review procedure is discretionary with the department and all costs of the review 17procedure shall be paid by the applicant.AB257,418Section 4. 29.193 (2) (cd) 2. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,6,21929.193 (2) (cd) 2. b. The person has a permanent substantial loss of function 20in one or both arms and fails to meet the minimum standards of the standard upper 21extremity pinch test, the standard grip test, or the standard nine-hole peg test, 22administered under the direction of a licensed physician, a licensed physician 1assistant, a licensed chiropractor, or a certified licensed advanced practice 2registered nurse prescriber.AB257,53Section 5. 29.193 (2) (cd) 2. c. of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,6,8429.193 (2) (cd) 2. c. The person has a permanent substantial loss of function in 5one or both shoulders and fails to meet the minimum standards of the standard 6shoulder strength test, administered under the direction of a licensed physician, a 7licensed physician assistant, a licensed chiropractor, or a certified licensed 8advanced practice registered nurse prescriber.AB257,69Section 6. 29.193 (2) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,6,191029.193 (2) (e) Review of decisions. An applicant denied a permit under this 11subsection, except a permit under par. (c) 3., may obtain a review of that decision by 12a licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, a licensed chiropractor, a 13licensed podiatrist, or a certified licensed advanced practice registered nurse 14prescriber designated by the department and with an office located in the 15department district in which the applicant resides. The department shall pay for 16the cost of a review under this paragraph unless the denied application on its face 17fails to meet the standards set forth in par. (c) 1. or 2. A review under this 18paragraph is the only method of review of a decision to deny a permit under this 19subsection and is not subject to further review under ch. 227.AB257,720Section 7. 29.193 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,7,22129.193 (3) (a) Produces a certificate from a licensed physician, a licensed 22physician assistant, a licensed optometrist, or a certified licensed advanced practice 23registered nurse prescriber stating that his or her sight is impaired to the degree 1that he or she cannot read ordinary newspaper print with or without corrective 2glasses.AB257,83Section 8. 45.40 (1g) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,7,10445.40 (1g) (a) “Health care provider” means an advanced practice registered 5nurse prescriber who is certified who may issue prescription orders under s. 441.16 6441.09 (2), an audiologist who is licensed under subch. II of ch. 459 or who holds a 7compact privilege under subch. III of ch. 459, a dentist who is licensed under subch. 8I of ch. 447 or who holds a compact privilege under subch. II of ch. 447, an 9optometrist who is licensed under ch. 449, a physician who is licensed under s. 10448.02, or a podiatrist who is licensed under s. 448.63.AB257,911Section 9. 46.03 (44) of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,7,211246.03 (44) Sexually transmitted disease treatment information. 13Prepare and keep current an information sheet to be distributed to a patient by a 14physician, a physician assistant, or certified an advanced practice registered nurse 15prescriber who may issue prescription orders under s. 441.09 (2) providing 16expedited partner therapy to that patient under s. 441.092, 448.035, or 448.9725. 17The information sheet shall include information about sexually transmitted 18diseases and their treatment and about the risk of drug allergies. The information 19sheet shall also include a statement advising a person with questions about the 20information to contact his or her physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 21pharmacist, or local health department, as defined in s. 250.01 (4).AB257,1022Section 10. 50.01 (1b) of the statutes is repealed.AB257,1123Section 11. 50.08 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,8,42450.08 (2) A physician, an advanced practice registered nurse prescriber 1certified who may issue prescription orders under s. 441.16 441.09 (2), or a 2physician assistant who prescribes a psychotropic medication to a nursing home 3resident who has degenerative brain disorder shall notify the nursing home if the 4prescribed medication has a boxed warning under 21 CFR 201.57.AB257,125Section 12. 50.09 (1) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,8,13650.09 (1) (a) (intro.) Private and unrestricted communications with the 7resident’s family, physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse 8prescriber, attorney, and any other person, unless medically contraindicated as 9documented by the resident’s physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 10registered nurse prescriber in the resident’s medical record, except that 11communications with public officials or with the resident’s attorney shall not be 12restricted in any event. The right to private and unrestricted communications shall 13include, but is not limited to, the right to:AB257,1314Section 13. 50.09 (1) (f) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,8,201550.09 (1) (f) 1. Privacy for visits by spouse or domestic partner. If both 16spouses or both domestic partners under ch. 770 are residents of the same facility, 17the spouses or domestic partners shall be permitted to share a room unless 18medically contraindicated as documented by the resident’s physician, physician 19assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse prescriber in the resident’s medical 20record.AB257,1421Section 14. 50.09 (1) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:AB257,9,22250.09 (1) (h) Meet with, and participate in activities of social, religious, and 23community groups at the resident’s discretion, unless medically contraindicated as 1documented by the resident’s physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 2registered nurse prescriber in the resident’s medical record. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab257 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab257 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB257 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB257 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB257: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting